Wisconsin, session 2025, SB516.
do enact as follows:SB516,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB516,28Section 2. 20.515 (1) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB516,2,13920.515 (1) (dm) Actuarial studies by group insurance board; school district 10participation in group health insurance. As a continuing appropriation, the 11amounts in the schedule for conducting the studies of voluntary and mandatory 12participation by school districts in a group health insurance plan offered by the 13group insurance board under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 3 (1) (a).SB516,314Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.SB516,2,1615(1) Actuarial studies by group insurance board; school district 16participation in group health insurance.SB516,2,2117(a) The group insurance board, in consultation with the actuary selected 18under s. 40.03 (1) (d) to perform actuarial services for group health insurance plans 19offered by the group insurance board, shall conduct a study of the potential costs 20and savings to school districts and current plan participants for each of the 21following:SB516,2,23221. If all Wisconsin school districts are required to participate in a group health 23insurance plan offered by the group insurance board.SB516,3,212. If Wisconsin school districts voluntarily participate in a group health 2insurance plan offered by the group insurance board.SB516,3,53(b) By no later than 6 months after the effective date of this paragraph, the 4group insurance board shall submit a written report of the studies under par. (a) to 5the governor and the joint committee on finance.SB516,3,66